Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 23a. new text end new text begin Drilling machine. new text end new text begin "Drilling machine" means a motorized machine or mechanical device mounted on a truck, trailer, crawler, or skid used for boring or to excavate, drill, or bore a well. A drilling machine includes a cable tool, hollow rod, auger, or rotary tool. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.86, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Fees; proceeds deposited; appropriation. The commissioner, with respect to highways under the commissioner's jurisdiction, may charge a fee for each permit issued. The fee for an annual permit that expires by law on the date of the vehicle registration expiration must be based on the proportion of the year that remains until the expiration date. All fees for permits issued by the commissioner of transportation must be deposited as provided in paragraph (i) and in section 174.525. Except for those annual permits for which the permit fees are specified elsewhere in this chapter, the fees are: (a) $15 for each single trip permit. (b) $36 for each job permit. A job permit may be issued for like loads carried on a specific route for a period not to exceed two months. "Like loads" means loads of the same product, weight, and dimension. (c) $60 for an annual permit to be issued for a period not to exceed 12 consecutive months. Annual permits may be issued for: (1) motor vehicles used to alleviate a temporary crisis adversely affecting the safety or well-being of the public; (2) motor vehicles that travel on interstate highways and carry loads authorized under subdivision 1a; (3) motor vehicles operating with gross weights authorized under section 169.826, subdivision 1a; (4) special pulpwood vehicles described in section 169.863; (5) motor vehicles bearing snowplow blades not exceeding ten feet in width; (6) noncommercial transportation of a boat by the owner or user of the boat; and (7) motor vehicles carrying bales of agricultural products authorized under section 169.862. (d) $120 for an oversize annual permit to be issued for a period not to exceed 12 consecutive months. Annual permits may be issued for: (1) mobile cranes; (2) construction equipment, machinery, and supplies; (3) manufactured homes and manufactured storage buildings; (4) implements of husbandry; (5) double-deck buses; (6) commercial boat hauling and transporting waterfront structures, including, but not limited to, portable boat docks and boat lifts; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (7) three-vehicle combinations consisting of two empty, newly manufactured trailers for cargo, horses, or livestock, not to exceed 28-1/2 feet per trailer; provided, however, the permit allows the vehicles to be moved from a trailer manufacturer to a trailer dealer only while operating on twin-trailer routes designated under section 169.81, subdivision 3, paragraph (c)new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (8) drilling machinesnew text end . (e) For vehicles that have axle weights exceeding the weight limitations of sections 169.823 to 169.829, an additional cost added to the fees listed above. However, this paragraph applies to any vehicle described in section 168.013, subdivision 3, paragraph (b), but only when the vehicle exceeds its gross weight allowance set forth in that paragraph, and then the additional cost is for all weight, including the allowance weight, in excess of the permitted maximum axle weight. The additional cost is equal to the product of the distance traveled times the sum of the overweight axle group cost factors shown in the following chart: Overweight Axle Group Cost Factors Weight (pounds) Cost Per Mile For Each Group Of: exceeding weight limitations on axles Two consecutive axles spaced within 8 feet or less Three consecutive axles spaced within 9 feet or less Four consecutive axles spaced within 14 feet or less 0-2,000 .12 .05 .04 2,001-4,000 .14 .06 .05 4,001-6,000 .18 .07 .06 6,001-8,000 .21 .09 .07 8,001-10,000 .26 .10 .08 10,001-12,000 .30 .12 .09 12,001-14,000 Not permitted .14 .11 14,001-16,000 Not permitted .17 .12 16,001-18,000 Not permitted .19 .15 18,001-20,000 Not permitted Not permitted .16 20,001-22,000 Not permitted Not permitted .20 The amounts added are rounded to the nearest cent for each axle or axle group. The additional cost does not apply to paragraph (c), clauses (1) and (3). For a vehicle found to exceed the appropriate maximum permitted weight, a cost-per-mile fee of 22 cents per ton, or fraction of a ton, over the permitted maximum weight is imposed in addition to the normal permit fee. Miles must be calculated based on the distance already traveled in the state plus the distance from the point of detection to a transportation loading site or unloading site within the state or to the point of exit from the state. (f) As an alternative to paragraph (e), an annual permit may be issued for overweight, or oversize and overweight, mobile cranes; construction equipment, machinery, and supplies; implements of husbandry; new text begin drilling machines; new text end and commercial boat hauling. The fees for the permit are as follows: Gross Weight (pounds) of Vehicle Annual Permit Fee 90,000 or less $200 90,001 - 100,000 $300 100,001 - 110,000 $400 110,001 - 120,000 $500 120,001 - 130,000 $600 130,001 - 140,000 $700 140,001 - 145,000 $800 145,001 - 155,000 $900 If the gross weight of the vehicle is more than 155,000 pounds the permit fee is determined under paragraph (e). (g) For vehicles which exceed the width limitations set forth in section 169.80 by more than 72 inches, an additional cost equal to $120 added to the amount in paragraph (a) when the permit is issued while seasonal load restrictions pursuant to section 169.87 are in effect. (h) $85 for an annual permit to be issued for a period not to exceed 12 months, for refuse-compactor vehicles that carry a gross weight of not more than: 22,000 pounds on a single rear axle; 38,000 pounds on a tandem rear axle; or, subject to section 169.828, subdivision 2, 46,000 pounds on a tridem rear axle. A permit issued for up to 46,000 pounds on a tridem rear axle must limit the gross vehicle weight to not more than 62,000 pounds. (i) $300 for a motor vehicle described in section 169.8261. The fee under this paragraph must be deposited as follows: (1) the first $50,000 in each fiscal year must be deposited in the trunk highway fund for costs related to administering the permit program and inspecting and posting bridges; and (2) all remaining money in each fiscal year must be deposited in the bridge inspection and signing account as provided under subdivision 5b. (j) $200 for an annual permit for a vehicle operating under authority of section 169.824, subdivision 2, clause (2). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end